Utah statutes.
53B-22-102.   Utah State University revenue bonds -- Student family housing and Human Resource Research Center.

(1)  The State Board of Regents, on behalf of Utah State University, may issue, sell, and deliver revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of Utah State University to borrow money on the credit of the income and revenues of Utah State University, other than appropriations of the Legislature, to finance the cost of constructing, furnishing, and equipping a student family housing project and a Human Resource Research Center.

(2)  The bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this section may not exceed $6,600,000 for the student family housing project and $6,000,000 for the Human Resource Research Center, and shall be issued in accordance with Title 53B, Chapter 21, Revenue Bonds, under such terms and conditions and in such amounts as the board, by resolution, determines are reasonable and necessary.

